Class-F/f3.foma
### Sinhala.foma ###

# Vowels
define A [ක | ​ඛ | ග | ​ඝ | ච | ​ඡ | ජ | ට | ඨ | ඩ | ඪ | ණ | ත | ද | ධ | න | ප | ඵ | බ | භ | ම | ය | ර | ල | ව | ශ | ෂ | ස | හ | ළ | ​ෆ | ඟ | ඬ | ඳ | ඹ];

define B [ග ෙ න];

define C [ව | ව ත ි | ව න ් න ී ය | ව න ් න ෙ ම ි | ව න ් න ෙ ම ු | ව න ් න ෙ හ ි | ව න ් න ෙ හ ු | ව න ් න ේ ය | ව න ් න ෝ ය | ව ම ි | ව ම ු | ව ය ි | ව හ ි | ව හ ු | ව න ් න ට | ව ම ි න ්];



read lexc f3.lexc
define Lexicon;

######### Rewrite rules

###
define UganiAClass          ි -> ් || A _ "^" C ;
define UganiBClass          උ ග න ි -> ඉ || _ "^" B ;

# To Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define ClassE1Grammar 	Lexicon                 .o.
                        UganiAClass             .o.
                        UganiBClass             .o.
               	        Cleanup;

regex ClassE1Grammar;
